Utah statutes.
31A-22-1007.   Employer's insolvency.

Every workers' compensation policy or contract shall contain a provision that the insolvency of the employer and his discharge does not relieve the insurer from the payment of compensation for injuries or death sustained by an employee during the life of that policy or contract.

